src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - kantuvradieđáhus: # KANTUR SgNomCmp + JOHTOLAT
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Nom: [konttordieđáhus, kontordieđáhus, gánttordieđáhus, gántordieđáhus, kontuvradieđáhus, kantuvradieđáhus, gántuvradieđáhus]
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Nom: [kánttordieđáhus, kánturdieđáhus, kántordieđáhus, gánturdieđáhus]
#    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Loc: [konttordieđáhusas, kontordieđáhusas, gánttordieđáhusas, gántordieđáhusas, kontuvradieđáhusas, kantuvradieđáhusas, kánttordieđáhusas, kánturdieđáhusas, kántordieđáhusas, gánturdieđáhusas, gántuvradieđáhusas]
#    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Ill: [konttordieđáhussii, kontordieđáhussii, gánttordieđáhussii, gántordieđáhussii, kontuvradieđáhussii, kantuvradieđáhussii, kánttordieđáhussii, kánturdieđáhussii, kántordieđáhussii, gánturdieđáhussii, gántuvradieđáhussii]
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Nom: [konttor-dieđáhus, kontor-dieđáhus, gánttor-dieđáhus, gántor-dieđáhus, kontuvra-dieđáhus, kantuvra-dieđáhus, kánttor-dieđáhus, kántur-dieđáhus, kántor-dieđáhus, gántur-dieđáhus, gántuvra-dieđáhus]
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Loc: [konttor-dieđáhusas, kontor-dieđáhusas, gánttor-dieđáhusas, gántor-dieđáhusas, kontuvra-dieđáhusas, kantuvra-dieđáhusas, kánttor-dieđáhusas, kántur-dieđáhusas, kántor-dieđáhusas, gántur-dieđáhusas, gántuvra-dieđáhusas]
    kantuvra+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dieđáhus+N+Sg+Ill: [konttor-dieđáhussii, kontor-dieđáhussii, gánttor-dieđáhussii, gántor-dieđáhussii, kontuvra-dieđáhussii, kantuvra-dieđáhussii, kánttor-dieđáhussii, kántur-dieđáhussii, kántor-dieđáhussii, gántur-dieđáhussii, gántuvra-dieđáhussii]


  Noun - čáhppesoasus: # VIELG Attr + MALISLONG
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Nom: čáhppesoasus
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Gen: čáhppesossosa
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Acc: čáhppesossosa
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Loc: čáhppesossosis
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Ill: čáhppesossosii
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Com: čáhppesossosiin
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Nom: čáhppesossosat
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Gen: čáhppesossosiid
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Acc: čáhppesossosiid 
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Loc: čáhppesossosiin 
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Ill: čáhppesossosiidda
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Com: čáhppesossosiiguin
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Ess: čáhppesoasusin
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: čáhppesossosaš
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: čáhppesossosaččaš
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: čáhppesoasusheapme
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: čáhppesoasuslaš
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Nom: čáhppes-oasus
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Gen: čáhppes-ossosa
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Acc: čáhppes-ossosa
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Loc: čáhppes-ossosis
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Ill: čáhppes-ossosii
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Sg+Com: čáhppes-ossosiin
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Nom: čáhppes-ossosat
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Gen: čáhppes-ossosiid
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Acc: čáhppes-ossosiid 
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Loc: čáhppes-ossosiin 
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Ill: čáhppes-ossosiidda
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Pl+Com: čáhppes-ossosiiguin
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Ess: čáhppes-oasusin
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: čáhppes-ossosaš
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: čáhppes-ossosaččaš
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: čáhppes-oasusheapme
    čáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#oasus+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: čáhppes-oasuslaš


  Noun - viežžanolmmoš : # BOAHTINTV SgCmp + FALIS
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Nom: viežžanolmmoš 
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Loc: viežžanolbmos
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Ill: viežžanolbmui
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Nom: viežžan-olmmoš 
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Loc: viežžan-olbmos
    viežžat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#olmmoš+N+Sg+Ill: viežžan-olbmui

  Noun - uksageahči : # GOAHTI-A SgNomCmp + AIGI
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: uksageahči
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: uksageažis
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: uksageahčái
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: uksa-geahči
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: uksa-geažis
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: uksa-geahčái

#  Noun - uvssageahči : # GOAHTI-A SgGenCmp + AIGI - uksa får berre standard-samansetjing, SgNom
#    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: uvssageahči
#    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: uvssageažis
#    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: uvssageahčái
#    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: uvssa-geahči
#    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: uvssa-geažis
#    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: uvssa-geahčái
#
#  Noun - uvssaidgeahči : # GOAHTI-A PlGenCmp + AIGI
#    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: uvssaidgeahči
#    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: uvssaidgeažis
#    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: uvssaidgeahčái
#    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: uvssaid-geahči
#    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: uvssaid-geažis
#    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: uvssaid-geahčái

  Noun - uksafávttageahči : # GOAHTI-A SgGenCmp + AIGI
    uksafákta+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom:          uksafávttageahči
    uksafákta+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc:          uksafávttageažis
    uksafákta+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill:          uksafávttageahčái
    uksafákta+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: uksafávtta-geahči
    uksafákta+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: uksafávtta-geažis
    uksafákta+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: uksafávtta-geahčái

  Noun - uksafávttaidgeahči : # GOAHTI-A PlGenCmp + AIGI
    uksafákta+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom:          uksafávttaidgeahči
    uksafákta+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc:          uksafávttaidgeažis
    uksafákta+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill:          uksafávttaidgeahčái
    uksafákta+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Nom: uksafávttaid-geahči
    uksafákta+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Loc: uksafávttaid-geažis
    uksafákta+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#geahči+N+Sg+Ill: uksafávttaid-geahčái

  Noun - niibedilli : # GOAHTI-I SgNomCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: niibedilli
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: niibedilis
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: niibedillái
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [niibe-dilli]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [niibe-dilis]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [niibe-dillái]


#  Noun - niibbidilli : # GOAHTI-I SgGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT - niibi får berre standard-samansetjing, SgNom
#    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [niibbidilli, niibbedilli]
#    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [niibbidilis, niibbedilis]
#    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [niibbidillái, niibbedillái]
#    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [niibbi-dilli, niibbe-dilli]
#    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [niibbi-dilis, niibbe-dilis]
#    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [niibbi-dillái, niibbe-dillái]
#
#  Noun - niibbiiddilli : # GOAHTI-I PlGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
#    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: niibbiiddilli
#    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: niibbiiddilis
#    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: niibbiiddillái
#    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: niibbiid-dilli
#    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: niibbiid-dilis
#    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: niibbiid-dillái

  Noun - niiberávdedilli : # GOAHTI-I SgGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT - niibi får berre standard-samansetjing, SgNom
    niiberávdi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom:          [niiberávdidilli,   niiberávdedilli]
    niiberávdi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc:          [niiberávdidilis,   niiberávdedilis]
    niiberávdi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill:          [niiberávdidillái,  niiberávdedillái]
    niiberávdi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [niiberávdi-dilli,  niiberávde-dilli]
    niiberávdi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [niiberávdi-dilis,  niiberávde-dilis]
    niiberávdi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [niiberávdi-dillái, niiberávde-dillái]

  Noun - niiberávdiiddilli : # GOAHTI-I PlGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    niiberávdi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom:          niiberávdiiddilli
    niiberávdi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc:          niiberávdiiddilis
    niiberávdi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill:          niiberávdiiddillái
    niiberávdi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: niiberávdiid-dilli
    niiberávdi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: niiberávdiid-dilis
    niiberávdi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: niiberávdiid-dillái

#   Noun - SgGenCmp + muorra :
#    sápmi+N+Cmp#muorra+N+Sg+Nom: sámemuorra
#    oktavuohta+N+Cmp#muorra+N+Sg+Nom: oktavuođamuorra
#    direktevra+N+Cmp#muorra+N+Sg+Nom: direktevrramuorra
#    luondu+N+Cmp#muorra+N+Sg+Nom: luonddumuorra
#
#   Noun - PlGenCmp + muorra :
#    sápmi+N+Cmp#muorra+N+Sg+Nom: sámiidmuorra
#    oktavuohta+N+Cmp#muorra+N+Sg+Nom: oktavuođaidmuorra
#    direktevra+N+Cmp#muorra+N+Sg+Nom: direktevrraidmuorra
#    luondu+N+Cmp#muorra+N+Sg+Nom: luondduidmuorra
